Arkansas, session 2025, SB485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-4-101, concerning definitions with
respect to the disposition of offenders, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(8) "Criminogenic" means those factors which are static and
dynamic personal and situational characteristics that increase the risk of
criminality and reoffending.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-4-303(a), concerning the requirements
that a court shall attach as conditions of the suspension of a sentence or
probation, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) If a court suspends imposition of sentence on a defendant or
places him or her on probation, the court shall attach such conditions as are
reasonably necessary to assist the defendant in leading a law-abiding life.
(2) Conditions attached by the court shall be narrowly tailored:
*CEB177*
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
(A) To account for the rehabilitation of the defendant and
for public safety; and
(B) To the criminogenic risks and needs of the defendant.
(3)(A) If a presentence investigation has been conducted under §
5-4-102, the court shall take into consideration the findings of the
presentence investigation when determining the conditions of the defendant's
probation.
(B) If the court does not order a presentence
investigation, the court shall rely on all available information before the
court in determining the conditions of probation.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-4-303(c), concerning the requirements
that a court may attach as conditions of the suspension of a sentence or
probation, is amended to read as follows:
(c) If the court suspends imposition of sentence on a defendant or
places him or her on probation, as a condition of its order the court may
require that the defendant:
(1) Support his or her dependents and meet his or her family
responsibilities;
(2) Undergo available medical or psychiatric treatment and enter
and remain in a specified institution when required for medical or
psychiatric treatment;
(3) Participate in a community-based rehabilitative program or
work-release program that uses practices proven to reduce recidivism and for
which the court may impose a reasonable fee or assessment on the defendant to
be used in support of the community-based rehabilitative program or work-
release program;
(4)(A) Refrain from frequenting an unlawful or designated place
or consorting with a designated person.
(B) A designated person may be a specific individual or a
specific class of persons, but only when reasons for such designation are set
forth in the order;
(5) Have no firearm in his or her possession;
(6) Make restitution to an aggrieved party in an amount the
defendant can afford to pay for the actual loss or damage caused by his or
her offense;
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
(7) Post a bond, with or without surety, conditioned on the
performance of a prescribed condition; and
(8) Satisfy any other condition reasonably related to the
rehabilitation of the defendant and not unduly restrictive of his or her
liberty or incompatible with his or her freedom of conscience.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 5-4-306 is amended to read as follows:
5-4-306. Time period generally.
If a court suspends imposition of sentence on a defendant or places him
or her on probation, the period of suspension or probation shall be for a
definite period of time not to exceed the maximum jail or prison sentence
allowable for the offense charged taking into account the recommended periods
of suspension or probation as adopted by the Arkansas Sentencing Commission.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 12-27-103(b)(18), concerning the functions,
power, and duties of the Division of Correction, is amended to read as
follows:
(18) The Department of Corrections shall establish the Evidence-
based Practices and Quality Assurance Unit that conducts programs of
research, evaluation, statistics, audit, and planning, including studies and
evaluation of the performance of various functions and activities of the
department and studies affecting the treatment of offenders and information
about other programs; and

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 12-27-126(d), concerning the duties of the
Director of the Division of Community Correction, is amended to read as
follows:
(d) Subject to the rules, policies, and procedures prescribed by the
Board of Corrections, the director shall:
(1) Administer the Division of Community Correction and
supervise the administration of all facilities, programs, and services under
the Division of Community Correction's jurisdiction;
(2) Employ such personnel as are required in the administration
of the provisions of this act subchapter, provided that the employment of
personnel shall be in accordance with the applicable laws and personnel rules
of the state;
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
(3) Institute programs for the training and development of
personnel within the Division of Community Correction and have authority to
suspend, discharge, or otherwise discipline personnel in accordance with
policies prescribed by the Board of Corrections;
(4) Make an annual report to the Board of Corrections, which
will be forwarded to the Governor and the General Assembly, on the work of
the Division of Community Correction, including statistics and other data,
income derived from fee collection, a summary of expenditures of the Division
of Community Correction, and progress reports regarding internal issues such
as offender success, programming development, bed space utilization, and
future needs; and
(5) Cooperate with the Division of Correction, the Post-Prison
Transfer Board, the Arkansas Sentencing Commission, judicial districts,
counties, and municipalities to provide the guidance and services required to
ensure a full range of correctional and community correction options for the
state as a whole; and
(6) In consultation with the Evidence-based Practices and
Quality Assurance Unit, develop a system for evaluating and promoting a
community supervision officer based on dimensions that include without
limitation the community supervision officer's ability to:
(A) Accurately complete risk and needs assessments;
(B) Develop evidence-based supervision case plans based on
the results of the risk and needs assessment; and
(C) Engage and encourage a person to participate in the
rehabilitation-oriented case plan and to change his or her behaviors.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 12-27-127(a), concerning the transfer of an
inmate to the Division of Community Correction, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) When the committing court designates that a statutorily
eligible inmate may not be administratively transferred to a community
correction center, the committing court shall include in the sentencing order
under subdivision (a)(2) of this section a written explanation of how the
committing court determined that the inmate should not be administratively
transferred.

04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 12-29-112, concerning the discharge or
release of an inmate from a state facility, is amended to add additional
subsections to read as follows:
(f) To the extent that an inmate is engaging in prosocial activities
while incarcerated, the inmate’s reentry plan shall prioritize the
continuation of those activities, including without limitation continued
employment and continued participation in mental health treatment or
substance abuse treatment, or both.
(g) As used in this section, "prosocial" means positive behaviors,
activities, efforts, and attitudes that, according to current research,
encourage an individual to adhere to societal norms and avoid criminal
behavior.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 16-10-103, concerning the training and
education of court personnel, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(c) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall consult with the
Department of Corrections to develop training and judicial education on the
use of evidence-based practices to reduce recidivism, including without
limitation the use of risk and needs assessment tools.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 16-13-703(c)(2), concerning imprisonment
credit for a period of imprisonment for nonpayment of a fine, is amended to
read as follows:
(2)(A) The period of imprisonment shall not exceed one (1) day
for each forty dollars ($40.00) one hundred dollars ($100) of the fine,
thirty (30) days if the fine was imposed upon conviction of a misdemeanor, or
one (1) year if the fine was imposed upon conviction of a felony, whichever
is the shorter period.
(B)(i) The For a defendant who was eligible to be
represented by a public defender, the total amount of fines owed shall not
automatically be reduced by the period of imprisonment, but the court may
with a credit forty dollars ($40.00) of one hundred dollars ($100) for each
day of imprisonment against the total fine, excluding any amount owed for
restitution, the defendant has been sentenced to pay.
(ii) A defendant who was not eligible to be
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
represented by a public defender may petition the court for the relief
provided under subdivision (c)(2)(B)(i) of this section.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 16-90-102, concerning presentence officers
appointed by the judicial district to prepare presentence reports, is amended
to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(d) Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (c) of this section and
subject to funding by the General Assembly, the Administrative Office of the
Courts shall develop a pilot program to expand the number of presentence
officers dedicated to preparing presentence reports with a validated risk and
needs assessment component.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 16-90-802(d)(1), concerning the powers and
duties of the Arkansas Sentencing Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) The commission shall adopt an initial sentencing
standards grid and an offense seriousness reference table based upon the
statutory parameters and additional data and information gathered before
January 1, 1994.
(B) The commission shall also set:
(i) the The percentage of time within parameters set
by law to be served for offenses at each seriousness level before any type of
transfer or release; and
(ii) Guidelines for presumptive periods of
suspension or probation;

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 16-90-802(d)(11), concerning the powers
and duties of the Arkansas Sentencing Commission, is amended to read as
follows:
(11) Coordinate with the Director of the Arkansas Sentencing
Commission, the Division of Correction, and the Division of Community
Correction to develop policy to ensure that the intake process best utilizes
maximizes the use of beds in nontraditional correctional facilities,
including without limitation community correction centers, work release
centers, and reentry facilities; and

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 16-90-1304(b), concerning the application
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
of earned discharge and completion of sentence, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) No less If the Division of Community Correction proposes to
discharge the sentence of a person under community supervision under this
subchapter, no fewer than forty-five (45) days before the discharge date, the
Division of Community Correction division shall submit notice to:
(A) The prosecuting attorney; and
(B) The Post-Prison Transfer Board.
(2)(A) Within thirty (30) days of receipt of the earned
discharge notice under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the prosecuting
attorney or the board may submit to the division in writing any reasonable
objection to early discharge under this subchapter warranting the forfeiture
of earned-discharge credit.
(B) An objection submitted under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of
this section shall be in writing and state the reason for the objection.
(3) If an objection under subdivision (b)(2) of this section is
lodged, the division shall immediately suspend the discharge of the sentence.
(4) The parolee or probationer may file a petition for review in
the sentencing court.
(5) A review shall be conducted in the sentencing court within
fourteen (14) days of the filing of the petition.
(6)(A) The sentencing court shall consider the objections
against the person based solely on the information contained in the petition.
(B) The sentencing court shall determine, based on a
preponderance of the evidence, whether the person should not be discharged
from the sentence because, if the information contained in the petition had
been known to the division, the division would have ordered the forfeiture of
any of the discharge credit earned to that point or if insufficient evidence
exists that would warrant the forfeiture of discharge credit.
(C) If the sentencing court finds sufficient evidence
warranting a forfeiture of discharge credits, the division shall make the
necessary forfeiture of earned discharge credit appropriate for the type of
misconduct asserted in the objection.
(D)(i) If the sentencing court does not find sufficient
evidence exists that warrants forfeiture of discharge credits, the division
shall discharge the person immediately if the date upon which the completion
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
of the sentence occurred has passed.
(ii) If the date for completion of the sentence has
not occurred, the person shall return to the status held at the point the
objection was filed.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 16-93-101, concerning definitions with
respect to probation and parole, is amended to add additional subdivisions to
read as follows:
(16) "Criminogenic" means those factors which are static and
dynamic personal and situational characteristics that increase the risk of
criminality and reoffending; and
(17) "Prosocial" means positive behaviors, activities, efforts,
and attitudes that, according to current research, encourage an individual to
adhere to societal norms and avoid criminal behavior.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 16-93-306(c), concerning probation
supervision generally, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The Division of Community Correction shall allocate resources,
including the assignment of probation officers, to focus on moderate-risk and
high-risk offenders as determined by the actuarial assessment provided in
subdivision (b)(6) of this section.
(2) The Division of Community Correction shall require public
and private treatment and service providers that receive state funds for the
treatment of or service for probationers to use evidence-based programs and
practices.
(3) The Department of Corrections shall:
(A) Develop a process for annually evaluating each
provider under subdivision (c)(2) of this section; and
(B) Establish a clear policy disqualifying a noncompliant
provider from receiving public funds until the provider demonstrates the
ability to comply with the requirements of subdivision (c)(2) of this
section.
(4) In addition to the requirements in § 12-27-104, the Board of
Corrections shall include in its annual report the results of annual
evaluations under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section, listing each
provider determined to be noncompliant.
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
(5) The Division of Community Correction shall develop a
feedback system that routinely provides the Division of Community Correction
with process and aggregated outcome data.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 16-93-306(d)(2), concerning
administrative sanctions while on probation supervision, is amended to read
as follows:
(2)(A) The Division of Community Correction shall develop an
intermediate incentives and sanctions procedure and grid to guide a probation
officer in determining the appropriate response to prosocial behavior or a
violation of conditions of supervision.
(B) Intermediate sanctions Sanctions administered by the
Division of Community Correction are required to conform to the incentives
and sanctioning grid.
(C) The intermediate incentives and sanctioning grid shall
include:
(i) An assignment of point values to commonly
occurring violations of terms of probation or criminal behavior;
(ii) An assignment of point values to and suitable
rewards for behaviors that demonstrate prosocial effort or decrease the
likelihood of recidivism, including without limitation:
(a) Education;
(b) Workforce development;
(c) Community service; and
(d) Behavioral health programming; and
(e) Prosocial activity;
(iii) Details on the mechanisms by which points are
accumulated and reduced; and
(iv) Guidance on which intermediate sanctions should
be applied at which point thresholds;
(v) Rewards that are attainable and meaningful at
each risk level to motivate individuals throughout stages of supervision,
including without limitation achieving individualized goals, milestones, and
accomplishments; and
(vi) Guidance on the appropriate motivational ratio
of rewards to sanctions.
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 16-93-712(a), concerning parole
supervision, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Post-Prison Transfer Board shall establish written policies
and procedures governing the supervision of parolees designed to enhance
public safety and to assist the parolees in reintegrating into society.
(2)(A) The supervision of parolees shall be based on evidence-
based practices based on current research, including a validated risk-needs
assessment.
(B) Decisions shall target the parolee's criminal risk
factors with appropriate supervision and treatment designed to reduce the
likelihood of reoffense.
(C) Conditions of supervision shall be narrowly tailored
to:
(i) Account for the rehabilitation of the parolee
and for public safety; and
(ii) The criminogenic risks and needs of the
individual parolee.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 16-93-712(c), concerning the services
provided to people under parole supervision, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(3) The Department of Corrections shall:
(A) Develop a process for annually evaluating each
provider under subdivision (c)(2) of this section; and
(B) Establish a clear policy disqualifying a noncompliant
provider from receiving public funds until the provider demonstrates the
ability to comply with the requirements under subdivision (c)(2) of this
section.
(4) In addition to the requirements in § 12-27-104, the Board of
Corrections shall include in the annual report the results of annual
evaluations under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section, listing each
provider determined to be noncompliant.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 16-93-712(d)(2), concerning administrative
sanctions while on parole, is amended to read as follows:
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
(2)(A)(i) The Division of Community Correction shall develop an
intermediate incentives and sanctions procedure and grid to guide a community
supervision officer in determining the appropriate response to prosocial
behaviors or a violation of conditions of supervision.
(ii) The intermediate incentives and sanctions
procedure shall include a requirement that the community supervision officer
consider multiple factors when determining the sanction to be imposed,
including risk level, previous violations and sanctions, and the severity of
the current and prior violation.
(B) Intermediate Incentives and sanctions administered by
the Division of Community Correction are required to conform to the
incentives and sanctioning grid.
(C) The intermediate incentives and sanctioning grid shall
include:
(i) An assignment of point values to commonly
occurring violations of terms of parole or criminal behavior;
(ii) An assignment of point values to and suitable
rewards for behaviors that demonstrate prosocial effort or decrease the
likelihood of recidivism, including without limitation:
(a) Education;
(b) Workforce development;
(c) Community service; and
(d) Behavioral health programming; and
(e) Prosocial activity;
(iii) Details on the mechanisms by which points are
accumulated and reduced; and
(iv) Guidance on which intermediate sanctions should
be applied at which point thresholds;
(v) Rewards that are attainable and meaningful at
each risk level to encourage individuals throughout the stages of
supervision, including without limitation achieving individualized goals,
milestones, and accomplishments; and
(vi) Guidance on the appropriate motivational ratio
of rewards to sanctions.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1202(6), concerning the definition
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
of "eligibility" or "eligible offender" with respect to community correction,
is amended to read as follows:
(6) “Eligibility” or “eligible offender” means any person
convicted of a felony who is by law eligible for such sentence or who is
otherwise under the supervision of the Division of Community Correction and
who:
(A) who falls Falls within the population targeted by the
General Assembly for inclusion in community correction facilities;
(B) and who has Has not been subject to a disciplinary
violation for a violent act or for sexual misconduct while in the custody of
a jail or correctional facility; and
(C) does Does not have a current or previous conviction
for a violent or sexual offense listed under subdivision (10)(A)(ii) of this
section unless the previous conviction:
(i) Was more than five (5) years before the instant
offense; and
(ii) Resulted in a sentence that has expired;

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1906(a)(3), concerning post-release
supervision, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(C) Conditions of post-release supervision shall be
narrowly tailored to:
(i) Account for the rehabilitation of the offender
and for public safety; and
(ii) The criminogenic risks and needs of the
offender.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1906(c), concerning the services
provided people who are under post-release supervision, is amended to add
additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(3) The Department of Corrections shall:
(A) Develop a process for annually evaluating each
provider under subdivision (c)(2) of this section; and
(B) Establish a clear policy disqualifying a noncompliant
provider from receiving public funds until the provider demonstrates the
ability to comply with the requirements of subdivision (c)(2) of this
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
section.
(4) In addition to the requirements in § 12-27-104, the Board of
Corrections shall include in the annual report the results of annual
evaluations under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section, listing each
provider determined to be noncompliant.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1907(a)(2), concerning
administrative sanctions while on post-release supervision, is amended to
read as follows:
(2)(A) The Division of Community Correction shall develop an
intermediate incentives and sanctions procedure and an intermediate
incentives and sanctions grid to guide a community supervision officer in
determining the appropriate response to prosocial behavior or a violation of
the conditions of supervision.
(B) Intermediate Incentives and sanctions administered by
the Division of Community Correction shall conform to the intermediate
incentives and sanctions grid.
(C) The intermediate incentives and sanctions grid shall
include:
(i) An assignment of point values to commonly
occurring violations of terms of post-release supervision or criminal
behavior;
(ii) An assignment of point values to and suitable
rewards for behaviors that demonstrate prosocial effort or decrease the
likelihood of recidivism including without limitation:
(a) Education;
(b) Workforce development;
(c) Community service; and
(d) Behavioral health programming; and
(e) Prosocial activity;
(iii) Details on the mechanisms by which points are
accumulated and reduced; and
(iv) Guidance on which intermediate sanctions should
be applied at which points point thresholds;
(v) Rewards that are attainable and meaningful at
each risk level to encourage individuals throughout the stages of
04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB485
supervision, including without limitation achieving individualized goals,
milestones, and accomplishments; and
(vi) Guidance on the appropriate motivational ratio
of rewards to sanctions.

/s/C. Tucker






























04-03-2025 09:20:34 CEB177